italian.aff
# Italian dictionary for full-text search
#
# Copyright 2001, 2002 Gianluca Turconi
# Copyright 2002, 2003, 2004 Gianluca Turconi, Davide Prina
# Copyright 2004, 2005, 2006 Davide Prina
# Copyright 2007 Daniele Varrazzo
#
# E-Mail: piro(CHIOCCIOLA)develer(PUNTO)com
#
# Version 0.1 (yyyy-mm-dd)
#
# This file is distributed under GPL license
#
# This file is part of the Italian dictionary for full-text search.
#
# The Italian dictionary for full-text search is free software; you can
# redistribute it and/or modify it under the terms of the GNU General Public
# License as published by the Free Software Foundation; either version 2 of
# the License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
# The Italian dictionary for full-text search is distributed in the hope that
# it will be useful, but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied
# warranty of MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the
# GNU General Public License for more details.
#
# You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public
# License along with Italian dictionary for full-text search,
# if not, write to the Free Software Foundation, Inc.,
# 51 Franklin Street, Fifth Floor, Boston, MA  02110-1301, USA
#
# GPL license can be found here:
# http://www.fsf.org/licenses/licenses.html

#SET ISO8859-15
#TRY aoertncmdpgubzfvhà'ACMSkBGPLxEyRVòIODNwFéùèìjZKHWJYQ

MAP 5
MAP aàAÀ
MAP eéèEÉÈ
MAP iìIÌ
MAP oòOÒ
MAP uùUÙ

suffixes

# Sostantivi maschili

flag *a:
    [^IGC]  O   >   -O,I
    [GC]    O   >   -O,HI
    I       O   >   -O,
    [^CG]   A   >   -A,I
    [CG]    A   >   -A,HI
            E   >   -E,I

# Sostantivi femminili

flag *b:
    [^GC]   A   >   -A,E
    [GC]    A   >   -A,HE

# Forme alternativa di costruzione del plurale maschile (manico -> manici)
# e femminile (freccia -> frecce)

flag *c:
    I       A   >   -IA,E
            O   >   -O,I

# Forme alternative di femminili

flag *d:
    T   O   R   E   >   -ORE,RICE
    T   O   R   E   >   -ORE,RICI

        [^CG]   A   >   -A,ESSA
        [^CG]   A   >   -A,ESSE

        [CG]    A   >   -A,HESSA
        [CG]    A   >   -A,HESSE

                E   >   SSA
                E   >   SSE

                O   >   -O,ESSA
                O   >   -O,ESSE

# Pronomi indefiniti (qualcuno, nessuno...)

flag *e:
    O       >   -O,A

# Aggettivi e sostantivi sia maschili che femminili

flag *f:
        [^IGC]  O   >   -O,I
        [GC]    O   >   -O,HI
        I       O   >   -O,
                E   >   -E,I

                O   >   -O,A
                E   >   -E,A

        [^GC]   O   >   -O,E
        [GC]    O   >   -O,HE

# Forma alternativa di plurale maschile (amico -> amici, amica, amiche)

flag *g:
                O   >   -O,I
                O   >   -O,A
        [^CG]   O   >   -O,E
        [CG]    O   >   -O,HE

# Superlativo assoluto
# Non deve andare sulle parole col flag /p, ma solo su /o e /S

flag *h:
        [^IGC]  O   >   -O,ISSIMO
        [^IGC]  O   >   -O,ISSIMI
        [^IGC]  O   >   -O,ISSIMA
        [^IGC]  O   >   -O,ISSIME

                E   >   -E,ISSIMO
                E   >   -E,ISSIMI
                E   >   -E,ISSIMA
                E   >   -E,ISSIME

        I       O   >   -O,SSIMO
        I       O   >   -O,SSIMI
        I       O   >   -O,SSIMA
        I       O   >   -O,SSIME

        [CG]    O   >   -O,HISSIMO
        [CG]    O   >   -O,HISSIMA
        [CG]    O   >   -O,HISSIME
        [CG]    O   >   -O,HISSIMI

# Superlativo su aggettivi in forma -co -> -ci (es. amico, amici)
# Queste parole sono caratterizzate dal flag /p

flag *i:
                O   >   -O,ISSIMO
                O   >   -O,ISSIMA
                O   >   -O,ISSIME
                O   >   -O,ISSIMI

# Superlativo in -errimo

flag *j:
    [^E]    R   E   >   -RE,ERRIMO
    [^E]    R   E   >   -RE,ERRIMI
    [^E]    R   E   >   -RE,ERRIMA
    [^E]    R   E   >   -RE,ERRIME

    E       R   E   >   -E,RIMO
    E       R   E   >   -E,RIMI
    E       R   E   >   -E,RIMA
    E       R   E   >   -E,RIME

   [^E]     R   O   >   -RO,ERRIMO
   [^E]     R   O   >   -RO,ERRIMI
   [^E]     R   O   >   -RO,ERRIMA
   [^E]     R   O   >   -RO,ERRIME

   E        R   O   >   -O,RIMO
   E        R   O   >   -O,RIMI
   E        R   O   >   -O,RIMA
   E        R   O   >   -O,RIME

# Avverbi

flag k:
                A   >   MENTE
                O   >   -O,AMENTE
          [^RL] E   >   MENTE
   [AEIOU]  R   E   >   -E,MENTE
   [^AEIOU] R   E   >   MENTE
   [^L]     L   E   >   -E,MENTE
   L        L   E   >   MENTE

flag l:
                O   >   -O,EMENTE

# Avverbio sul superlativo. Questo flag dovrebbe essere applicato a tutti
# Gli aggettivi che hanno i flag (y | Y) & W

flag *m:
    [^IGC]  O   >   -O,ISSIMAMENTE
    [CG]    O   >   -O,HISSIMAMENTE
    I       O   >   -O,SSIMAMENTE
    [^R]    E   >   -E,ISSIMAMENTE
    R       E   >   -RE,ERRIMAMENTE


# Diminutivi, vezzeggiativi, accrescitivi...

flag *n:
   [^ICG]   A   >   -A,INA
   [^ICG]   A   >   -A,INE
   [CG]     A   >   -A,HINA
   [CG]     A   >   -A,HINE
   [CG]     A   >   -A,HETTA
   [CG]     A   >   -A,HETTE
   [^CG]    A   >   -A,ETTA
   [^CG]    A   >   -A,ETTE
   I        A   >   -A,NA
   I        A   >   -A,NE
            A   > -A,ONA
            A   > -A,ONE

# Troncamento

flag *o:
    A       >   -A
    E       >   -E
    O       >   -O


# Suffissi per i verbi
# --------------------

# troncamento su infinito
flag *A:
    [aei] r e       >    -e,
    r r e           >    -re,
