italian.dict
accomandolare/ABCGKOSVY1
acre/jkm
acritico/gik
addobbatore/ad
addoppiatura/b
aeroscivolante/a
affabile/ahk
affluire/ABCGKOSVY1
agnato/f
alcolico/g
allegorista/ab
allevatore/ad
allusivo/fk
ambascia/c
amico/gi
ammaccare/ABCGKOSVY1
amore/ao
anaglifo/a
anatomico/gk
ancora/bo
andaluso/f
angoliera/b
angusto/hk
antimicrobico/g
antipatico/gik
aponeurotico/g
appesantire/ABCGKOSVY1
appestatore/ad
apprettatura/b
arbitrario/fk
arcano/fk
areopagita/a
aristocratico/gik
artificioso/fhk
artropatia/b
asciolvere/ABCGKOSVY1
aspro/fhjk
assertore/ad
associazionistico/g
asta/abn
astronomo/f
atrio/c
audiocassetta/b
autocisternista/ab
autodenunciare/ABCGKOSVY1
autonomistico/g
avaro/fhk
avventuroso/fhk
bachicoltore/ad
bagnaticcio/f
barbaccia/c
bardatura/b
baronaggio/a
basettino/ahk
bastiano/o
bastionare/ABCGKOSVY1
battuta/bn
beccamosca/bn
benvisto/f
berlicca/bn
bestiaccia/c
bestiola/bn
bicorno/ahk
bimetallico/g
biochimico/gk
bistecchiera/b
blando/fhkm
bleso/f
blindaggio/a
boccuccia/c
braccheggiatore/df
branda/bn
breccia/c
briscola/bn
brizzolato/fh
bruscare/ABCGKOSVY1
buccia/c
buddistico/g
bulboso/f
buono/fhko
cabila/b
cadauno/e
cagna/bn
caldera/bn
camauro/a
canaglia/bn
cantonata/bn
cantone/ao
canzonaccia/c
caotico/gik
caramelloso/f
cardinale/ao
cartellonista/ab
cartuccia/c
casto/fhk
casuale/ak
catechizzatore/ad
catena/bn
catottrico/g
cattolico/gik
causare/ABCGKOSVY1
celebre/aj
celere/ahjk
celibato/a
cella/bn
centrale/ahkm
centuplo/f
chiaro/fhkm
chilotone/ao
chiocciola/bn
ciangottio/c
ciascheduno/e
ciascuno/eo
cielo/ao
cilindratura/b
classico/gik
classistico/gk
cocciuto/fhk
cofirmatario/f
coguaro/a
colonizzatore/ad
comico/gik
commemorare/ABCGKOSVY1
compendiabile/ak
conifera/b
considerare/ABCGKOSVY1
consociativo/f
consortile/a
consumatore/ad
contegnoso/fhk
corrispettivo/fk
corteccia/c
craterico/g
cravatta/bn
crenato/f
crittografare/ABCGKOSVY1
crivellatura/b
cromatico/gik
cruento/fl
cubista/ab
cucina/bn
cumulatore/ad
cuore/ao
cupido/fhk
delineare/ABCGKOSVY1
democratico/gik
depilatorio/cf
derelitto/f
detrattore/ad
devoto/fhk
diacritico/g
diagonale/ak
diametrale/ak
digitare/ABCGKOSVY1
dinamico/gik
diseconomia/b
disgustoso/fhk
disinstallare/ABCGKOSVY1
dissueto/f
distruttore/ad
dittico/c
divino/fk
dodecafonico/g
domanda/bn
dovere/1ABDKOSVYa
eccezionale/ahk
eccezione/ao
echeggiare/ABCGKOSVY1
economico/gik
elvetico/g
embrionario/f
endemico/gk
endorfina/b
epatoprotettore/ad
episodico/gk
eppure/o
ergastolo/a
ermetico/gik
espletare/ABCGKOSVY1
essenziale/ahk
estroso/fhk
etico/gik
eudemonico/g
eventuale/ahk
farmaco/c
faticatore/ad
fatiscente/ahk
fattore/ad
fenditura/b
fervoroso/fhk
figliuolo/fo
filodrammatico/g
filologico/gk
finale/ahk
finalizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
fiore/ao
fiottio/c
fontana/bn
fosco/fhk
fotoreazione/a
fotostatico/g
franchigia/b
franco/fk
fraudolento/fl
fresatore/ad
frogia/bc
funesto/fhk
gabellare/ABCGKOSVY1
gaio/fhkm
geloso/fhk
gendarmesco/f
generico/gik
gentile/ahko
geomagnetico/g
giapponeseria/b
ginepraio/a
gonfaloniere/f
gonorroico/g
gracidio/c
grammatologico/gk
gramolatore/ad
grato/fhk
gravare/ABCGKOSVY1
idea/bn
idroscalo/f
idrosciistico/g
iettatura/b
igienico/gik
ignizione/a
immalinconire/ABCGKOSVY1
immediato/fhk
immotivato/fhk
impagliatore/ad
impetuoso/fhk
impratichire/ABCGKOSVY1
inadeguato/fhk
incauto/fhk
inconsistente/ahk
inconstante/a
incorretto/fhk
incruento/fhl
indagatore/ad
indiscriminato/fhk
indissolubile/ak
infiggere/ABDGKOUXY1
infisso/f
infrenabile/ak
ingegnoso/fhk
insoddisfacente/a
inspiegabile/ahk
instauratore/ad
insubordinatezza/b
integro/fjk
interfaccia/c
interfonico/g
intontire/ABCGKOSVY1
invidioso/fhk
involontario/fk
ipogastrico/g
ironico/gik
irrazionalismo/a
irroratore/ad
irruento/fhl
isotermo/f
istmico/g
kilotone/ao
lacrimoso/fk
laico/gik
lavagna/bn
lavanderia/b
lento/fhkm
letale/ahk
licaone/a
liquore/ao
litologo/g
liturgo/ac
locomotore/ad
ludico/gk
lunigiano/f
macrorrinia/b
malfamato/fh
malignare/ABCGKOSVY1
mamma/bn
manicheismo/a
manico/cf
mano/fo
mariologico/g
massacratore/ad
massivo/fk
megatone/ao
mellito/f
menzogna/bn
mercatura/b
microbilancia/c
microprogramma/a
microsmotico/g
minestra/bn
misero/fjk
mnemonico/gk
modico/gik
molatore/ad
monsignore/ao
motobarca/b
mughetto/a
musicale/ahk
mutolo/f
narcisistico/gik
nautico/g
nemico/gi
nessuno/eho
normatore/ad
notarile/ak
nuraghe/a
nutrire/ABDHKOSVY1
oceanografia/b
odontalgico/g
odore/ao
ognuno/eo
oltremondano/f
omicidio/c
onore/ao
originale/ahk
ormeggiatore/ad
ortografico/gk
ospizio/a
ossequioso/fhk
paleria/b
panlogico/c
papilloso/f
paremiologico/g
particolare/ahko
partizionabile/a
patrio/cf
patrono/dfo
pattinatore/ad
pentola/bn
pentolaccia/c
peppola/b
percentuale/ak
persistere/ABCGKOTWY1
piano/fhko
piattello/a
pigiatore/ad
pignolesco/f
pio/gik
pioggia/c
pipa/bn
pistola/bn
pleurico/g
poco/fh
poetico/gik
policitemia/b
poltrone/hi
porcile/a
possessivo/fk
pratico/gik
prefatore/ad
preghiera/bn
prescolastico/g
prescrittivo/f
proceleusmatico/c
programmatore/ad
promiscuo/fk
promulgatore/ad
pronunziare/ABCGKOSVY1
psicopedagogia/b
pure/o
quadrifarmaco/c
quadripartitico/g
qualcheduno/e
qualcuno/eo
quale/ao
racchetta/bn
radicale/ako
radiocronista/ab
radunatore/ad
ragazza/bn
rappresentativo/fk
reale/ako
recente/ahk
recintare/ABCGKOSVY1
refrigeratore/ad
reggia/bc
registico/gk
renella/b
repubblica/bn
retrostante/a
riconficcare/ABCGKOSVY1
riduttore/ad
rinfrancare/ABCGKOSVY1
riscuotitore/ad
rispecchiamento/a
ristretto/fhkm
roba/abn
rollio/c
roncola/bn
rondella/bn
rotacizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
rousseauiano/f
ruba/b
ruzzolio/c
salace/ak
saldatore/ad
salubre/ajk
sbadato/fhk
sbiancatore/ad
sbraitio/c
scacchistico/g
scaldapanca/bn
scavare/ABCGKOSVY1
schiettezza/b
sciabordio/c
scorbutico/gik
scricchiolio/c
scultoreo/fk
secondino/f
seggiola/bn
selezionatore/ad
semirimorchio/a
seppure/o
severo/fhk
sfebbrare/ABCGKOSVY1
sgommatura/b
sgretolio/c
simpatico/gik
simultaneo/fk
singolare/ahko
sinonimico/g
solfatare/ABCGKOSVY1
sollecito/fhk
solo/fko
somministrativo/f
sparatoria/b
spartitore/ad
spartitraffico/c
spaventoso/fk
speciale/ahko
spettabile/a
splendere/ABCGKOSVY1
stanza/bn
stomachico/g
strangolatura/b
strano/fhk
strofinio/c
studioso/fhk
stufa/bn
subdelegare/ABCGKOSVY1
sublime/ak
suono/ao
tagliatore/ad
tale/ako
telebanda/b
teletermografo/a
tenerone/f
termocinetico/g
terraccia/c
testardo/fk
timore/ao
tonda/bn
tonneggiare/ABCGKOSVY1
totipista/ab
treggia/c
tronfione/f
tropico/g
truffatore/ad
turbolento/fhkl
tutelabile/a
ultimo/fhk
uno/eo
urografia/b
varare/ABCGKOSVY1
vesuviano/f
viceparroco/c
vino/ao
violento/fhl
virile/ahk
visita/bn
vivo/fhkm
voliera/b
vulcanizzatore/ad
zefiro/ao
